Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2126
Certified social workers and certified master social workers; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that certified social workers and certified master social workers provide a wide range of psychosocial assessment, intervention, and support services that do not constitute the clinical treatment services of licensed mental health practitioners, psychologists, or physicians. The Legislature therefor finds that it is appropriate to provide for certification of social workers and master social workers.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 36;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,317;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 743.